src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON EVEN_POT_PAACCID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>eh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_VYELGID_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_VYELGID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_VYELGID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_VYELGID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_VYELGID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ like VYEIJID, but -i for reduced forms. 7 verbs
! common with vyejid
2SYLL_VYEIJID_VYELGID_COMMON ;

! different from vyeijid
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^RLEN K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:i^WG^RLEN K ;  !
+Imprt+ConNeg:i K ;
+VGen:i^WG^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Ind: EVEN_IND_VYELGID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i^CSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !myetiš kyettip
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:l 3_DERIVED_L ;
:á^VHIGH DER_MAS ;
+Ger+PxSg1:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger+Err/Orth:i^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Ger:i^WG%>dijn K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_VYELGID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;   !
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;   !
+Prs+Sg3:á^VHIGH K ;              !
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN^RVSH%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i^RVSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i^RVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>i3 K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_VYEIJID_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_VYEIJID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_VYEIJID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_VYEIJID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_VYEIJID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__  5 verbs
! common with vyelgid
2SYLL_VYEIJID_VYELGID_COMMON ;

! Different from vyelgid
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e^WG^RVSH K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:e^WG^RVSH K ;  !
+Imprt+ConNeg:e K ;
+VGen:e^WG^RVSH%>n VGEN ;

+Ind: EVEN_IND_VYEIJID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:e^CSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:il 3_DERIVED_L_CLEN ; ! vyeijiliđ
:á^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Ger:e^WG%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:e^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:e^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:e^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_VYEIJID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH%>m K ;   !
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH%>h K ;   !
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;              !
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN^RVSH%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h K ;
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;


! start 3
LEXICON 2SYLL_JYEHID_IV ! Still not in use, comment in when needed.
+V+IV: 2SYLL_JYEHID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_JYEHID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_JYEHID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_JYEHID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__  5 verbs
! common with vyelgid
2SYLL_VYEIJID_VYELGID_COMMON ;

! Different from vyelgid and from vyeijid
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:i^WG K ;  !
+Imprt+ConNeg:i^WG K ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_JYEHID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
:á^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Ger:i^WG%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:i^WG^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger+Err/Orth:i^WG^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+VGen:i^WG^RVSH%>n VGEN ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_JYEHID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^WG^VHIGH%>m K ;   !
+Prs+Sg2:á^WG^VHIGH%>h K ;   !
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;              !
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN^RVSH%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i^CSH^RVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h K ;
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ; ! Should have -vv- juovvijm
+Prt+Du2:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ; ! Should have -vv- juovvijd
+Prt+Du3:i^WG^CLEN^VBACK^RLEN%>in K ; ! Should have -vv- juovvijn
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_VYEIJID_VYELGID_COMMON  !!= * __@CODE@__
VINFINITES_VYEIJID_VYELGID ;
+Cond+Prs:á^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ; !
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_VYEIJID ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_VYEIJID ;
+Der1+Der/st:ist^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/tt:itt^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RLEN ; !


LEXICON VINFINITES_VYEIJID_VYELGID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:i%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;  !
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>á K ;  !
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN^RVSH%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â2^VHIGH%>m K ;  !
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN^RVSH%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:e^WG^RVSH VABESS ;
+VAbess+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%>hennáá K ;
+VAbess+Err/Orth:e^WG^RVSH%>hinnáá K ;

+Actio+Nom:i%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:i^CSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:i^CSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:i^CSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:i^CSH%>min K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:i%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_VYEIJID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_VYEIJID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg3:u^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>s K ;  !
+Du1:o^CLEN^VHIGH%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;         !
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;   !
+Pl2:i%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;       !


LEXICON 2SYLL_KASTID
+V: 2SYLL_KASTID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KASTID_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_KASTID_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KASTID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_KASTID_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_KASTID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 9 verbs
:  VINFINITES_KASTID ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_KASTID ;
+Cond+Prs:á^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_KASTID ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_KASTID ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/st:ist^WG 3_DERIVED ;
+Der1+Der/tt:itt^WG 3_DERIVED ;
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:á^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !

LEXICON VINFINITES_KASTID  !!= ** __@CODE@__ kä^RVst
+Inf:i%>đ K ;

+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:á^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:á^WG^VHIGH%>á K ;
+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:á^VHIGH%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:â2^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e C_TAHHEE ;
+VAbess:i^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:i^WG^RLEN%>n VGEN ;


+Actio+Nom:i%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:i%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:i%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:i%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:i%>min K ;
+Ger:i%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:i%>m FLAG_3HUKSIM ;


LEXICON EVEN_IND_KASTID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:á^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:á^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:á^VHIGH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN^RVSH%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:i%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:i%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:i%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:i%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:i^WG^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:i^WG%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:i^WG%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:i^WG%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:i^WG^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:i^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^CLEN^VBACK%>i3 K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_KASTID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:i^WG^VBACK%>žeem K ;
+Sg2:i^WG^VBACK%>žeeh K ;
+Sg3:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:i^WG^VBACK%>žeen K ;
+Du2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:i^WG^VBACK%>žává K ;
+Pl1:i^WG^VBACK%>žep K ;
+Pl2:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i^WG^VBACK%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_KASTID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:i^WG^RLEN K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>s K ;
+Du1:o^VHIGH%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:i%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_TIETTID_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_TIETTID_V ;
